Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3961
Use of funds; limitations.

The board shall not set up programs or agencies of its own but shall fund active, ongoing, qualified programs as stated in section 114 of the Dairy Production Stabilization Act of 1983, Public Law 98-180, as amended, and the regulations promulgated pursuant thereto. Funds may be used by qualified programs to jointly sponsor projects with any private or public organization to meet the objectives of the Dairy Industry Development Act.

Laws 1992, LB 275, § 14.